Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/TechTerms.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1087 N 1
SFX 1087 0 gons .

SFX 1088 N 1
SFX 1088 0 Gordan .

SFX 1089 N 1
SFX 1089 0 Gradient .

SFX 1090 N 1
SFX 1090 0 GradientField .

SFX 1091 N 1
SFX 1091 0 gram .

SFX 1092 N 1
SFX 1092 0 grams .

SFX 1093 N 1
SFX 1093 0 Granularity .

SFX 1094 N 1
SFX 1094 0 graph .

SFX 1095 N 1
SFX 1095 0 Graph .

SFX 1096 N 1
SFX 1096 0 GraphCommunities .

SFX 1097 N 1
SFX 1097 0 GraphDistance .

SFX 1098 N 1
SFX 1098 0 GraphDistribution .

SFX 1099 N 1
SFX 1099 0 GraphIsomorphism .

SFX 1100 N 1
SFX 1100 0 GraphPartition .

SFX 1101 N 1
SFX 1101 0 GraphQ .

SFX 1102 N 1
SFX 1102 0 graphs .

SFX 1103 N 1
SFX 1103 0 gray .

SFX 1104 N 1
SFX 1104 0 grays .

SFX 1105 N 1
SFX 1105 0 Grays .

SFX 1106 N 1
SFX 1106 0 Greater .

SFX 1107 N 1
SFX 1107 0 GreaterEqual .

SFX 1108 N 1
SFX 1108 0 GreaterFullEqual .

SFX 1109 N 1
SFX 1109 0 GreaterGreater .

SFX 1110 N 1
SFX 1110 0 GreaterLess .

SFX 1111 N 1
SFX 1111 0 GreaterSlantEqual .

SFX 1112 N 1
SFX 1112 0 GreaterTilde .

SFX 1113 N 1
SFX 1113 0 GReduce .

SFX 1114 N 1
SFX 1114 0 Green .

SFX 1115 N 1
SFX 1115 0 Grid .

SFX 1116 N 1
SFX 1116 0 GridLines .

SFX 1117 N 1
SFX 1117 0 GridLinesStyle .

SFX 1118 N 1
SFX 1118 0 ground .

SFX 1119 N 1
SFX 1119 0 groundAppearance .

SFX 1120 N 1
SFX 1120 0 groundTasksSettings .

SFX 1121 N 1
SFX 1121 0 Group .

SFX 1122 N 1
SFX 1122 0 GroupBase .

SFX 1123 N 1
SFX 1123 0 GroupData .

SFX 1124 N 1
SFX 1124 0 Grouping .

SFX 1125 N 1
SFX 1125 0 GroupingRules .

SFX 1126 N 1
SFX 1126 0 GroupJ1 .

SFX 1127 N 1
SFX 1127 0 GroupJ2 .

SFX 1128 N 1
SFX 1128 0 GroupJ3 .

SFX 1129 N 1
SFX 1129 0 GroupJ4 .

SFX 1130 N 1
SFX 1130 0 GroupM11 .

SFX 1131 N 1
SFX 1131 0 GroupM12 .

SFX 1132 N 1
SFX 1132 0 GroupM22 .

SFX 1133 N 1
SFX 1133 0 GroupM23 .

SFX 1134 N 1
SFX 1134 0 GroupM24 .

SFX 1135 N 1
SFX 1135 0 GroupMemberQ .

SFX 1136 N 1
SFX 1136 0 GroupOpenCloseIcon .

SFX 1137 N 1
SFX 1137 0 GroupOpener .

SFX 1138 N 1
SFX 1138 0 GroupRu .

SFX 1139 N 1
SFX 1139 0 Groups .

SFX 1140 N 1
SFX 1140 0 Gudermannian .

SFX 1141 N 1
SFX 1141 0 h .

SFX 1142 N 1
SFX 1142 0 H .

SFX 1143 N 1
SFX 1143 0 H1 .

SFX 1144 N 1
SFX 1144 0 H2 .

SFX 1145 N 1
SFX 1145 0 HalfPeriods .

SFX 1146 N 1
SFX 1146 0 HalfPeriodW1 .

SFX 1147 N 1
SFX 1147 0 HalfPeriodW2 .

SFX 1148 N 1
SFX 1148 0 HalfPeriodW3 .

SFX 1149 N 1
SFX 1149 0 HamiltonianCycle .

SFX 1150 N 1
SFX 1150 0 HamiltonianField .

SFX 1151 N 1
SFX 1151 0 HamiltonianPath .

SFX 1152 N 1
SFX 1152 0 HankelTransform .

SFX 1153 N 1
SFX 1153 0 HarrisWindow .

SFX 1154 N 1
SFX 1154 0 Hash .

SFX 1155 N 1
SFX 1155 0 HatTransform .

SFX 1156 N 1
SFX 1156 0 Haversine .

SFX 1157 N 1
SFX 1157 0 Header .

SFX 1158 N 1
SFX 1158 0 heads .

SFX 1159 N 1
SFX 1159 0 Heap .

SFX 1160 N 1
SFX 1160 0 hedral .

SFX 1161 N 1
SFX 1161 0 hedron .

SFX 1162 N 1
SFX 1162 0 Height .

SFX 1163 N 1
SFX 1163 0 Heights .

SFX 1164 N 1
SFX 1164 0 Held .

SFX 1165 N 1
SFX 1165 0 HeldPart .

SFX 1166 N 1
SFX 1166 0 Hemisphere .

SFX 1167 N 1
SFX 1167 0 hen .

SFX 1168 N 1
SFX 1168 0 henries .

SFX 1169 N 1
SFX 1169 0 henry .

SFX 1170 N 1
SFX 1170 0 hens .

SFX 1171 N 1
SFX 1171 0 hertz .

SFX 1172 N 1
SFX 1172 0 HiddenMarkovStates .

SFX 1173 N 1
SFX 1173 0 Highlight .

SFX 1174 N 1
SFX 1174 0 HighlightStyle .

SFX 1175 N 1
SFX 1175 0 Hints .

SFX 1176 N 1
SFX 1176 0 Histogram .

SFX 1177 N 1
SFX 1177 0 hki .

SFX 1178 N 1
SFX 1178 0 hner .

SFX 1179 N 1
SFX 1179 0 hok .

SFX 1180 N 1
SFX 1180 0 Hold .

SFX 1181 N 1
SFX 1181 0 HoleScale .

SFX 1182 N 1
SFX 1182 0 HorizontalScrolling .

SFX 1183 N 1
SFX 1183 0 horn .

SFX 1184 N 1
SFX 1184 0 houber .

SFX 1185 N 1
SFX 1185 0 house .

SFX 1186 N 1
SFX 1186 0 HS .

SFX 1187 N 1
SFX 1187 0 Hub .

SFX 1188 N 1
SFX 1188 0 Hundredweight .

SFX 1189 N 1
SFX 1189 0 hyperbola .

SFX 1190 N 1
SFX 1190 0 hyperbolas .

SFX 1191 N 1
SFX 1191 0 i .

SFX 1192 N 1
SFX 1192 0 I .

SFX 1193 N 1
SFX 1193 0 ial .

SFX 1194 N 1
SFX 1194 0 ialCorrelationFunction .

SFX 1195 N 1
SFX 1195 0 ialD .

SFX 1196 N 1
SFX 1196 0 ialFractionExpand .

SFX 1197 N 1
SFX 1197 0 ialFractions .

SFX 1198 N 1
SFX 1198 0 ialInvariants .

SFX 1199 N 1
SFX 1199 0 ialOrderQ .

SFX 1200 N 1
SFX 1200 0 ialRoot .

SFX 1201 N 1
SFX 1201 0 ialRootReduce .

SFX 1202 N 1
SFX 1202 0 ials .

SFX 1203 N 1
SFX 1203 0 ialSumOfSquares .

SFX 1204 N 1
SFX 1204 0 ian .

SFX 1205 N 1
SFX 1205 0 ianBridgeProcess .

SFX 1206 N 1
SFX 1206 0 ianCycle .

SFX 1207 N 1
SFX 1207 0 ianGraphQ .

SFX 1208 N 1
SFX 1208 0 ianQ .

SFX 1209 N 1
SFX 1209 0 ians .

SFX 1210 N 1
SFX 1210 0 ianss .

SFX 1211 N 1
SFX 1211 0 ic .

SFX 1212 N 1
SFX 1212 0 ich .

SFX 1213 N 1
SFX 1213 0 icleAcceleratorData .

SFX 1214 N 1
SFX 1214 0 icleData .

SFX 1215 N 1
SFX 1215 0 icMassUnit .

SFX 1216 N 1
SFX 1216 0 icNumber .

SFX 1217 N 1
SFX 1217 0 icolor .

SFX 1218 N 1
SFX 1218 0 icOrder .

SFX 1219 N 1
SFX 1219 0 icosacron .

SFX 1220 N 1
SFX 1220 0 icosahedron .

SFX 1221 N 1
SFX 1221 0 icosidodecahedral .

SFX 1222 N 1
SFX 1222 0 icosidodecahedron .

SFX 1223 N 1
SFX 1223 0 icQ .

SFX 1224 N 1
SFX 1224 0 ics .

SFX 1225 N 1
SFX 1225 0 ics3D .

SFX 1226 N 1
SFX 1226 0 ics3DBox .

SFX 1227 N 1
SFX 1227 0 ics3DBoxOptions .

SFX 1228 N 1
SFX 1228 0 icsArray .

SFX 1229 N 1
SFX 1229 0 icsBaseline .

SFX 1230 N 1
SFX 1230 0 icsBox .

SFX 1231 N 1
SFX 1231 0 icsBoxOptions .

SFX 1232 N 1
SFX 1232 0 icsColor .

SFX 1233 N 1
SFX 1233 0 icsColumn .

SFX 1234 N 1
SFX 1234 0 icsComplex .

SFX 1235 N 1
SFX 1235 0 icsComplex3DBox .

SFX 1236 N 1
SFX 1236 0 icsComplex3DBoxOptions .

SFX 1237 N 1
SFX 1237 0 icsComplexBox .

SFX 1238 N 1
SFX 1238 0 icsComplexBoxOptions .

SFX 1239 N 1
SFX 1239 0 icsContents .

SFX 1240 N 1
SFX 1240 0 icsData .

SFX 1241 N 1
SFX 1241 0 icsGrid .

SFX 1242 N 1
SFX 1242 0 icsGridBox .

SFX 1243 N 1
SFX 1243 0 icsGroup .

SFX 1244 N 1
SFX 1244 0 icsGroup3DBox .

SFX 1245 N 1
SFX 1245 0 icsGroup3DBoxOptions .

SFX 1246 N 1
SFX 1246 0 icsGroupBox .

SFX 1247 N 1
SFX 1247 0 icsGroupBoxOptions .

SFX 1248 N 1
SFX 1248 0 icsGrouping .

SFX 1249 N 1
SFX 1249 0 icSort .

SFX 1250 N 1
SFX 1250 0 icsRow .

SFX 1251 N 1
SFX 1251 0 icsSpacing .

SFX 1252 N 1
SFX 1252 0 icsStyle .

SFX 1253 N 1
SFX 1253 0 icTable .

SFX 1254 N 1
SFX 1254 0 icuboctahedral .

SFX 1255 N 1
SFX 1255 0 icuboctahedron .

SFX 1256 N 1
SFX 1256 0 icWeight .

SFX 1257 N 1
SFX 1257 0 id .

SFX 1258 N 1
SFX 1258 0 ID .

SFX 1259 N 1
SFX 1259 0 Identify .

SFX 1260 N 1
SFX 1260 0 idodecacron .

SFX 1261 N 1
SFX 1261 0 idodecadodecahedron .

SFX 1262 N 1
SFX 1262 0 idodecahedron .

SFX 1263 N 1
SFX 1263 0 ids .

SFX 1264 N 1
SFX 1264 0 ie .

SFX 1265 N 1
SFX 1265 0 iemens .

SFX 1266 N 1
SFX 1266 0 ier .

SFX 1267 N 1
SFX 1267 0 iera .

SFX 1268 N 1
SFX 1268 0 ieu .

SFX 1269 N 1
SFX 1269 0 ievert .

SFX 1270 N 1
SFX 1270 0 ieverts .

SFX 1271 N 1
SFX 1271 0 iewicz .

SFX 1272 N 1
SFX 1272 0 ihexacron .

SFX 1273 N 1
SFX 1273 0 ihexahedron .

SFX 1274 N 1
SFX 1274 0 ii .

SFX 1275 N 1
SFX 1275 0 ilterModel .

SFX 1276 N 1
SFX 1276 0 im .

SFX 1277 N 1
SFX 1277 0 Image .

SFX 1278 N 1
SFX 1278 0 ImageFunction .

SFX 1279 N 1
SFX 1279 0 ImagePyramid .

SFX 1280 N 1
SFX 1280 0 ImageSize .

SFX 1281 N 1
SFX 1281 0 ImageValue .

SFX 1282 N 1
SFX 1282 0 imes .

SFX 1283 N 1
SFX 1283 0 imi .

SFX 1284 N 1
SFX 1284 0 imitedArray .

SFX 1285 N 1
SFX 1285 0 imitedSequence .

SFX 1286 N 1
SFX 1286 0 imiter .

SFX 1287 N 1
SFX 1287 0 imiterFlashTime .

SFX 1288 N 1
SFX 1288 0 imiterMatching .

SFX 1289 N 1
SFX 1289 0 imiters .

SFX 1290 N 1
SFX 1290 0 imo .

SFX 1291 N 1
SFX 1291 0 Implies .

SFX 1292 N 1
SFX 1292 0 IncreasingSubsequence .

SFX 1293 N 1
SFX 1293 0 Indent .

SFX 1294 N 1
SFX 1294 0 IndependentEdgeSet .

SFX 1295 N 1
SFX 1295 0 IndependentVertexSet .

SFX 1296 N 1
SFX 1296 0 Index .

SFX 1297 N 1
SFX 1297 0 ine .

SFX 1298 N 1
SFX 1298 0 InequalityQ .

SFX 1299 N 1
SFX 1299 0 inet .

SFX 1300 N 1
SFX 1300 0 Infinity .

SFX 1301 N 1
SFX 1301 0 Inflation .

SFX 1302 N 1
SFX 1302 0 Information .
