Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/TechTerms.dic
Abelian/1121,1382
Alembert/1204
Alphabet/1218,1249
antimorph/1211
ArcCos/1141
ArcCot/1141
ArcCsc/1141
Arrow/10,352,1158
Artin/1204
Automatic/1280
Back/1118,1119,1120,1185
Blackman/1153,1688,2372
Bottom/1155,1492
Cayley/1095,1204
Clebsch/1088
CloudObject/1302,1303,1628,1994,2319
concho/1257,1263,2105
cong/1274,1380
Degree/417,1098,1490,1949,2035
denar/1191,1689,1752
Dialog/1293,1318,1484,1679,1860,1946,2148
Different/276,1195,1198,1200,1201
Dilworth/1095
DocumentGenerator/1302,1303,1994
EllipticF/1275
emirp/1282
Empty/1095,1101,1869,1919
equipotent/1193,1202
Fermat/1204
gauss/1204
GeoStyling/1278
gnomon/1211,1994
Grassmann/1204
Hankel/1143,1144,1558,2274
Harary/1095
Hermite/598,1142,1675
Hessian/1142
Hirsch/1183
Initialization/395,399,403,412,1121,1692,2324
Janko/1126,1127,1128,1129
kroon/1191
Language/390,578,1259,1734
LinkRead/1164,2400
LinkWrite/1164
Lucas/1271,1432
microrad/1204,1209,1994
millirad/1204,1209,1994
millis/1265,1269,1270,2191,2192,2258
multifactor/1193
nanos/1265,1269,1270,2191,2192
NetPort/1089
Noether/1204
Nyquist/1116,1816
Partition/1093,1869,2096,2112
pekro/1091,1092,1994
Permanent/1114,1915
Permissions/1121,1135,1139,1420,1422
Petersen/1095
Petr/1264,1765,2322
Pfaff/1204
pingin/1191
Position/1296
Release/1180,1685
rhomb/1211,1219,1220,1221,1222,1254,1255,1260,1261,1262,1272,1273,1377,1689,1712,1713,1994
Round/1291,1312,1313
Rudvalis/1138
Saalschütz/1204
santim/1191,1994
Schwarz/1204,2010
shus/1191,1367
Sinc/1212
Slot/1184,2035
spiro/1094,1102,1451
Struve/1142,1432
Sturm/1204
Symbol/1253,1433,1624,2050,2137
tefach/1276
tert/1209,1210,1380
Total/1162
TransitiveClosure/1095
TransitiveReduction/1095
vers/13,1177,1179,1217,1267,1297
xona/1091,1092
xonto/1091,1092
Xx/1191
$Permissions/1122
